Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.030

Conditions to award. (Effective until August 1, 2024. Recodified as RCW 11.54.015.)

(1) The court may not make an award unless the court finds that the funeral expenses, expenses of last sickness, and expenses of administration have been paid or provided for.

(2) The court may not make an award to a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner or child who has participated, either as a principal or as an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent.

[ 2008 c 6 s 918; 1997 c 252 s 50.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.